Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,226
Report to Clerk of the Legislature;
contents.

The Risk Manager shall report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature
all claims and judgments paid under the State Tort Claims Act. Such report
shall include the name of each claimant, a statement of the amount claimed
and the amount awarded, and a brief description of the claim including the
agency and program or activity under which the claim arose. Each member of
the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such
report by making a request for it to the Risk Manager.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 18, p. 2851;

Laws 1972, LB 1334, § 7;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 44;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 20;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 37;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 174.